Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1605
Violations; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person, partnership, limited liability company, firm, association, or corporation to issue, make, use, or circulate any accreditation without the authority and approval of the University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources or its duly authorized agency. Every person, partnership, limited liability company, firm, association, or corporation who violates any of the provisions of sections 54-1601 to 54-1605 pertaining to accreditation shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1967, c. 338, § 5, p. 906;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 45;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 41;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 344.